Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 6. Dissolution, Reorganization, Liquidation, and Department Possession.

Sec. 06.05.465.
Voluntary liquidation; requirements for approval. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.466.
Dissolution before commencement of business.

If the department discovers, after it approves the articles of incorporation for a bank but before it issues a certificate of authority to the bank, a reason why a bank should not have been incorporated, or if a certificate of authority is not issued within the later of one year after the issuance of the certificate of incorporation or the time the department allows for satisfaction of conditions precedent to the issuance of a certificate of authority, the bank shall voluntarily dissolve under AS

10.06.605

—

10.06.625

or may be involuntarily dissolved by the department under AS

10.06.633

.

History.

(§ 35 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 81 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.468.
Department takeover.

A state bank may be closed and the department may take possession of the bank if the bank voluntarily places its affairs and assets under the department’s control, or if the department finds

the bank has violated an order of the department;

the bank has violated a provision of this chapter or a regulation of the department adopted under this chapter;

the bank’s capital is impaired or the bank is otherwise in an unsafe or unsound condition;

the bank’s business is being conducted in an unlawful, unsafe, or unsound manner;

the bank is insolvent;

the bank is unable to continue normal operations;

a department examination of the bank is obstructed or impeded;

the bank holding company that controls the bank refuses to permit an examination as provided in AS

06.05.235

; or

the bank has lost, or received notice of the termination or suspension of, its membership in the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or has relinquished its membership in the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation without the consent of the department.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, before the department may take possession of a bank the department shall issue a notice to the board of directors of the bank under AS

06.01.030(a)

of the problems identified by the department and issue an order to the board under AS

06.01.030(b)

to correct the problems. The notice must also specify that failure to comply with the order may result in the department taking possession of the bank.

If a bank fails to comply with an order issued under (b) of this section, the department may take possession of the bank by posting upon the bank premises a notice stating that the department is assuming possession under this chapter. Department possession begins when the notice is posted. The notice shall also be filed in the superior court of the judicial district in which the bank is located. The department shall notify the local federal reserve bank if the bank is a member of the Federal Reserve System.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section and AS

06.01.030

, if, in the opinion of the department, an emergency exists that will result in serious losses to the depositors, the department may take possession of a bank without prior hearing. Within two days after the department takes possession under this subsection, an interested party may file with the department an application for an order vacating the possession. The department shall grant the application if the department finds that the department’s action was not authorized under this chapter.

History.

(§ 82 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.470.
Department in possession.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

When the department has taken possession of a state bank, it is vested with the full and exclusive power of management and control, including the power to continue or discontinue the business, to stop or limit the payment of the bank’s obligations, to employ necessary assistants, to execute any instrument in the name of the bank, to commence, defend, and conduct in the bank’s name any action or proceeding in which the bank may be a party, to terminate the possession by restoring the bank to its board of directors, and to reorganize or liquidate the bank under this chapter. As soon as practicable after taking possession, the department shall make an inventory of the assets and file a copy of the inventory with the superior court.

When the department has taken possession, there shall be a postponement, until six months after the commencement of that possession, of the date upon which any period of limitation fixed by a statute or agreement would otherwise expire on a claim or right of action of the bank, or upon which an appeal must be taken or a pleading or other document must be filed by the bank in any pending action or proceeding.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 4 ch 8 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

A judgment, lien, or attachment may not be enforced against any asset of the bank while it is in possession of the department. Upon the election of the department in connection with a liquidation or reorganization,

any lien or attachment, other than an attorney’s or mechanic’s lien, obtained upon any asset of the bank during the department’s possession or within four months before commencement of that possession, may be vacated, except liens created by the department while in possession; and

any transfer of an asset of the bank made after or in contemplation of its insolvency or in anticipation of the department’s takeover, with intent to effect a preference of one creditor over another creditor or to prevent the distribution of the bank’s assets according to law, is void.

The department may borrow money in the name of the bank in its possession and may pledge assets of the bank as security for the loan.

All necessary and reasonable expenses resulting from the department’s possession of a bank and of its reorganization or liquidation shall be paid from the assets of the bank.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

History.

(§ 3.402 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 36 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 133 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 4 ch 8 SLA 1987; am §§ 83, 84, 102 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.471.
Reorganization.

If the department decides to reorganize a state bank, the department, after according a hearing to all interested parties, shall enter an order proposing a reorganization plan. The department shall send a copy of the plan to each depositor and creditor who will not receive payment of a claim in full under the plan, and a notice that, unless within 30 days the plan is disapproved in writing by persons holding one-third or more of the aggregate amount of the claims, the department will reorganize the bank.

A plan of reorganization may not be prescribed under this chapter unless, in the opinion of the department,

the plan is fair to all classes of depositors, creditors, and shareholders;

subject to a fair adjustment for new capital that a class will pay under the plan, the face amount of the interest accorded to a class of depositors, creditors, or shareholders under the plan does not exceed the value of the assets at liquidation less the full amount of the claims of all prior classes;

the plan provides for the issuance of common stock in an amount that will provide an adequate ratio to deposits;

any exchange of new common stock for obligations or stock of the bank will be made

in the inverse order of the priorities in liquidation of the classes that will retain an interest in the bank; and

upon terms that adjust in a fair manner any change in the relative interest of the respective classes that will be produced by the exchange;

the plan assures the removal of a director, officer, or employee responsible for a problem identified by the department under AS

06.05.468(a)

— (b), including an unsafe, unsound, or unlawful action or the existence of an unsafe or unsound condition;

any merger or consolidation provided by the plan complies with this chapter.

When in the course of reorganization, supervening conditions render a plan of reorganization unfair or its execution impractical, the department may modify the plan or liquidate the bank.

History.

(§ 85 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.472.
Liquidation.

In liquidating a state bank, the department may exercise any power incidental to liquidating a bank, but it may not, without the approval of the superior court,

sell an asset of the bank having an appraised value in excess of $100,000;

compromise or release a claim that exceeds $100,000, exclusive of interest;

make full payment on a claim, other than a claim upon an obligation incurred by the department, before preparing and filing a schedule of the department’s determinations under AS

06.05.473(d)(3)

.

Within six months after beginning the liquidation of a bank, the department may terminate an executory contract for services or advertising to which the bank is a party or an obligation of the bank as a lessee. A lessor who receives 60 days’ notice of the department’s decision to terminate a lease does not have a claim for rent, other than rent accrued to the date of termination, or for damages due to the termination.

As soon as practical after beginning the involuntary liquidation of a bank, the department shall take the steps necessary to terminate all fiduciary positions held by the bank, to surrender all property held by the bank as a fiduciary, and to settle the fiduciary accounts of the bank.

History.

(§ 85 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.473.
Claims.

As soon as practical after beginning the liquidation of a state bank, the department shall

mail notice of the liquidation proceedings to the last known post office address of each depositor, creditor, lessee of a safe deposit box, or bailor of property;

post notice of the proceedings conspicuously on the premises of the bank; and

publish notice that the department determines to be appropriate for the proceedings.

The department shall mail with the notice sent under (a)(1) of this section a statement of the amount shown on the bank’s books to be the claim of the depositor or creditor. The notice must also include a demand that a person who is entitled to property held by the bank as bailee or in a safe deposit box of the bank withdraw the property within 30 days. The notice must direct those depositors and creditors who claim amounts different from the amounts in the notice to file their claims with the bank under the procedure described in the notice and before a specified date. The specified day may not be less than 60 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

A safe deposit box whose contents have not been removed within 30 days after demand shall be opened. The department shall retain the contents of the box and the other unclaimed property held by the bank as bailee until the conclusion of the liquidation proceedings. At the conclusion of the liquidation proceedings, the property held by the department under this subsection is considered abandoned, and the department shall turn the property over to the Department of Revenue for handling under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

Within six months after the last day specified in the notice for the filing of claims, or within a longer period if allowed by the superior court, the department shall

reject a claim that it determines to be invalid;

determine the amount, if any, owing to each known creditor or depositor and the priority class of the person’s claim under this chapter;

prepare a schedule of its determinations for filing in the superior court;

publish a notice in a newspaper once each week for three successive weeks, of the times and places where the schedule of determinations will be available for inspection and the date when the department will file its schedule in court; the date may not be sooner than 30 days after the first publication.

Within 30 days after the filing with the superior court of the department’s schedule under (d)(3) of this section, a creditor, depositor, or stockholder may file with the court an objection to a determination. The court shall hear and determine the filed objections after the notice to the department and interested claimants that the court establishes. If the court sustains an objection, the court shall direct that the schedule be modified appropriately.

After filing its schedule, the department may make partial distribution to the holders of the claims that are undisputed or are allowed by the court, if an adequate reserve is established for the payment of disputed claims. As soon as practicable after the determination of all objections, the department shall make the final distribution.

The following claims have priority in liquidation proceedings, in the order listed:

obligations incurred by the department in liquidating the bank;

wages and salaries of officers and employees earned during the three-month period preceding the department’s possession in an amount not exceeding $3,000 for each person;

fees and assessments owed by the bank to the department;

deposits;

claims secured by assets pledged under AS

06.05.260(a)

.

After the payment of all other claims, including interest at the rate of 10.5 percent a year, the department shall pay claims that are otherwise valid but that were not filed within the time prescribed.

If the sum available for a class of creditors is insufficient to provide payment in full, the sum shall be distributed pro rata to the claimants in the class.

When the department has liquidated a bank, any assets remaining after all claims have been paid shall be distributed to the shareholders in accordance with their respective interests.

Unclaimed funds remaining after the completion of the liquidation by the department shall be handled under AS

34.45.110

—

34.45.780

.

When the assets have been distributed in accordance with this chapter, the department shall file an accounting with the superior court. Upon approval of the account, the department is relieved of liability in connection with the liquidation, and the court shall cancel the certificate of authority of the bank and enter an order of dissolution. When the order is filed, the department shall issue a certificate of dissolution of the corporation.

History.

(§ 85 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Sec. 06.05.474.
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation as receiver or liquidator.

The department may appoint the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation as receiver for a state bank that the department has taken possession of, if the deposits of the bank are insured by that corporation. Upon filing with the court a certificate indicating the acceptance of the appointment by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the possession of and title to all the assets, business, and property of the bank are transferred to that corporation. The department is then relieved of all responsibility and liability with respect to the reorganization or liquidation of the bank. The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation may liquidate, reorganize, merge, or consolidate the bank in the manner permitted by the laws of the United States or by this chapter, and possesses all the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of the department in the liquidation, reorganization, merger, or consolidation of the bank under this chapter.

History.

(§ 85 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.475.
Subrogation of rights of depositors. [Repealed, § 54 ch 169 SLA 1978.]

Secs. 06.05.480 — 06.05.510.
Prohibited practices. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.515.
Slander and libel of bank. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]

Secs. 06.05.520 — 06.05.530.
Penalty; injunction; effect on existing banks. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.532.
[Renumbered as AS 06.05.548.]

Sec. 06.05.535.
[Renumbered as AS 06.05.910.]

Sec. 06.05.537.
[Renumbered as AS 06.05.900.]

Sec. 06.05.540.
[Renumbered as AS 06.05.990.]

Sec. 06.05.545.
[Renumbered as AS 06.05.995.]